Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.200

Failure to notify of price amendment, proof of compliance—Stop order—Waiver of certain conditions.

Upon failure to receive the required notification and post-effective amendment with respect to the price amendment referred to in RCW 21.20.190, the director may enter a stop order, without notice of hearing, retroactively denying effectiveness to the registration statement or suspending its effectiveness until compliance with RCW 21.20.190, if the director promptly notified the registrant by telephone, facsimile, or electronic transmission (and promptly confirms by letter or facsimile when the director notifies by telephone) of the issuance of the order. If the registrant proves compliance with the requirements as to notice and post-effective amendment, the stop order is void as of the time of its entry. The director may by rule or otherwise waive either or both of the conditions specified in RCW 21.20.190 (2) and (3). If the federal registration statement or other filing becomes effective before all these conditions are satisfied and they are not waived, the registration statement automatically becomes effective as soon as all the conditions are satisfied. If the registrant advises the director of the date when the federal registration statement or other filing is expected to become effective the director shall promptly advise the registrant by telephone, electronic transmission, or facsimile, at the registrant's expense, whether all the conditions are satisfied and whether the director then contemplates the institution of a proceeding under RCW 21.20.280 and 21.20.300; but this advice by the director does not preclude the institution of such a proceeding at any time.

[ 1994 c 256 s 15; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 12; 1959 c 282 s 20.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.